Florida, session 2026, HB1171.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. This act may be cited as the "Marine At-Risk
Native Endangered or Threatened Animal Protection Act."
Section 2. Section 379.24312, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
379.24312 Protections for endangered or threatened marine
animals.—
(1) As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Collect" means to physically capture, catch, remove,
or possess a marine animal species, or attempt to engage in any
such conduct.
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1171-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1171 2026
(b) "Endangered or threatened species" means any species
listed as endangered or threatened pursuant to the federal
Endangered Species Act, 16 U.S.C. s. 1531 et seq., under 50
C.F.R. ss. 223.102 and 224.101, or designated as endangered or
threatened by commission rule pursuant to s. 379.2291.
(c) "Educational or exhibition purposes" means the
holding, displaying, transporting, or maintaining of specimens
for public display, exhibition, or education, including
activities authorized under a special activity license issued by
the commission.
(d) "Marine animal" means any vertebrate or invertebrate
animal species, subspecies, or distinct population segment that
inhabits state waters, including, but not limited to, marine
mammals, sea turtles, fish, sharks, rays, crustaceans, mollusks
and corals, and any part thereof, including eggs, embryos,
tissue, cartilage, shells, or derivatives.
(e) "Transport" means to convey a marine animal species
from one location to another location on any street, road,
highway, waterway, or air space.
(2) A person may not collect or transport any endangered
or threatened marine animal from state waters for educational or
exhibition purposes.
(3) The commission may not issue, renew, or approve an
education-exhibition special activity license or other
authorization that would allow a person to collect or transport
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1171-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1171 2026
any endangered or threatened marine animal from state waters for
purposes prohibited in subsection (2).
(4) A person who violates this section commits a Level
Four violation under s. 379.401. Each endangered or threatened
marine animal collected or transported in violation of this
section constitutes a separate offense.
(5)(a) This section does not prohibit or restrict the
rescue, rehabilitation, or scientific study of marine animals
when such activities are conducted under state or federal
authorization consistent with the Endangered Species Act and
applicable commission rules.
(b) This section does not limit federal authority under
the Endangered Species Act, the Magnuson-Stevens Fishery
Conservation and Management Act, or the Convention on
International Trade in Endangered Species of Wild Fauna and
Flora.
Section 3. Paragraph (a) of subsection (4) of section
379.401, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
379.401 Penalties and violations; civil penalties for
noncriminal infractions; criminal penalties; suspension and
forfeiture of licenses and permits.—
(4) LEVEL FOUR VIOLATIONS.—
(a) A person commits a Level Four violation if he or she
violates any of the following provisions:
1. Section 379.24312, prohibiting the collection or
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1171-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1171 2026
transportation of endangered or threatened marine animals for
educational or exhibition purposes.
2.1. Section 379.354(16), prohibiting the making, forging,
counterfeiting, or reproduction of a recreational license or the
possession of same without authorization from the commission.
3.2. Section 379.365(2)(c), prohibiting criminal
activities relating to the taking of stone crabs.
4.3. Section 379.366(4)(c), prohibiting criminal
activities relating to the taking and harvesting of blue crabs.
5.4. Section 379.367(4), prohibiting the willful
molestation of spiny lobster gear.
6.5. Section 379.3671(2)(c)5., prohibiting the unlawful
reproduction, possession, sale, trade, or barter of spiny
lobster trap tags or certificates.
7.6. Section 379.404(5), prohibiting the sale of illegally
taken deer or wild turkey.
8.7. Section 379.4041(2), prohibiting the sale of
illegally taken bears.
9.8. Section 379.405, prohibiting the molestation or theft
of freshwater fishing gear.
10.9. Section 379.409, prohibiting the unlawful killing,
injuring, possessing, or capturing of alligators or other
crocodilia or their eggs.
11.10. Section 379.411, prohibiting the intentional
100 killing or wounding of any species designated as endangered,
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1171-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1171 2026
101 threatened, or of special concern.
102 12.11. Section 379.4115, prohibiting the killing of any
103 Florida or wild panther.
104 Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1171-00